Florida, session 2026, HB821.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (f) of subsection (3) of section
406.11, Florida Statutes, as created by HB 819, 2026 Regular
Session, is redesignated as paragraph (g), and a new paragraph
(f) is added to that subsection, to read:
406.11 Examinations, investigations, and autopsies.—
(3)
(f) An autopsy report of an autopsy performed pursuant to
paragraph (b) or paragraph (c) of an infant or a child who dies
suddenly and unexpectedly or of an individual of any age whose
death is suspected to be caused by SADS held by a medical
examiner is confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s.
24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution, except that:
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb821-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 821 2026
1. The surviving parents and adult siblings of the
deceased may view and copy the autopsy report.
2. The autopsy report may be released to the Department of
Health upon request as needed in connection with the performance
of its epidemiological research and tracking duties. The
Department of Health shall maintain the confidential and exempt
status of any such autopsy report it receives.
3. Information contained in an autopsy report, including
personal health information, may be submitted to a public health
authority in accordance with 45 C.F.R. ss. 164.500–164.535.
4. Deidentified information and aggregate data extracted
from autopsy reports prepared pursuant to this subsection may be
released to national research institutions for purposes of
epidemiological research and tracking.

This paragraph is subject to the Open Government Sunset Review
Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed on
October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and saved from repeal through
reenactment by the Legislature.
Section 2. The Legislature finds that it is a public
necessity that autopsy reports of an infant or a child who dies
suddenly and unexpectedly or of an individual of any age whose
death is suspected to be caused by Sudden Arrhythmic Death
Syndrome which are held by a medical examiner or the Department
of Health be made confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1),
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb821-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 821 2026
Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the State
Constitution. Section 406.11(3), Florida Statutes, requires that
autopsies in such sudden and unexpected deaths include
microscopic and toxicology studies and a review of the
deceased's immunization and medical records to prepare the
autopsy report. The Legislature finds that autopsy reports in
such cases will include findings of a sensitive nature, the
release of which could result in emotional injury to the
immediate family of the deceased and detract from the memory of
the deceased. The Legislature recognizes that the existence of
the Internet and the proliferation of personal computers and
cellular telephones throughout the world encourages and promotes
the wide dissemination of such reports and that widespread
unauthorized dissemination of such reports could subject the
immediate family of the deceased to continuous injury.
Section 3. This act shall take effect on the same date
that HB 819 or similar legislation takes effect, if such
legislation is adopted in the same legislative session or an
extension thereof and becomes a law.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb821-00